Rhode Island statutes. Title 15 Domestic Relations
Chapter 21 Child Support Lien Act

15-21-1.
Arrearages — Collection procedures.

The department of administration, division of taxation, child support enforcement, in accordance with Title IV, Part D of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 651 et seq., is authorized to institute collection procedures for all arrearages which accrue against child support payments owed pursuant to a court judgment or support order.

These collection procedures shall include, but not be limited to, notification to employers that a wage assignment is in effect and not suspended; notification to obligors; demand letters; use of state and federal tax refund intercept programs; initiation of contempt proceedings; use of lien, levy, and foreclosure of lien as provided in this chapter; garnishment or attachment of or lien against property; trustee process; civil actions; and any other civil remedy including body attachment, where appropriate, available for the enforcement of judgments or for the enforcement of child support orders.

[See §

12-1-15

of the General Laws.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 29, § 6; P.L. 1995, ch. 374, § 6; P.L. 1997, ch. 170, § 10.

15-21-2.
Creation of lien.

A child support obligation or reimbursement order which is enforceable by the department of administration, division of taxation, child support enforcement, in accordance with Title IV Part D of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 651 et seq., and which is unpaid in whole or in part shall, as of the date on which it was due, be a lien in favor of the obligee or assignee in an amount sufficient to satisfy unpaid child support, whether the amount due is a fixed sum or is accruing periodically. Once a child support lien arises, the lien shall incorporate any unpaid child support which may accrue in the future and shall not terminate except as provided in §

15-21-4(g)

. The lien shall encumber all tangible and intangible property, whether real or personal, and rights to property, whether legal or equitable, belonging to the obligor including, but not limited to, the obligor’s interest in any jointly held property. An interest in personal property acquired by the obligor after the child support lien arises shall be subject to the lien. Without limiting the forgoing, “property” as used in this chapter shall also include insurance and workers’ compensation payments.

In any case where a lien arises in jointly held property, a non-obligor joint party whose interest appears of record or is otherwise known to the department shall receive notice of intent to lien and may request an administrative hearing with the department to contest the scope of the property interests of the lien or may seek judicial review by motion to the family court. Service of the notice shall be made by first class mail.

[See §

12-1-15

of the General Laws.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 29, § 6; P.L. 1995, ch. 374, § 6; P.L. 1997, ch. 170, § 10; P.L. 2000, ch. 109, § 26; P.L. 2005, ch. 410, § 8.

15-21-3.
Notice.

Notice. When the department of administration, division of taxation, child support enforcement, determines that child support is unpaid, it shall send written notice of intent to lien to the obligor by first class mail at his or her most recent address of record.

The notice of intent shall specify the amount unpaid as of the date of the notice or other date certain and the obligor’s right to request a hearing by filing a written request with the department within thirty (30) days of the date of the notice. The notice shall identify the property, real or personal, which is subject to the lien. In addition, the notice shall:

State that the obligor has the right to a hearing on the issue of whether, and how much, child support is unpaid, and that the obligor may request a hearing within thirty (30) days of the date of the notice. The notice shall explain the procedure for requesting a hearing. If the obligor requests a hearing, the administrator or his or her designee shall conduct the hearing expeditiously and the department shall not conduct further lien enforcement action until the director or his or her designee makes a final determination that the obligor is in arrears in the payment of a child support obligation.

State that certain property and funds, whether in cash or in bank accounts, may be from a lien exempt by law. The notice shall include a list of appropriate exemptions.

Inform the obligor of the right to claim that part or all of the funds subject to the lien that may be exempt by law and provide the obligor with the opportunity to have an immediate hearing on the exemption issue. The notice shall explain the procedure for requesting an exemption hearing, and provide the obligor thirty (30) days from the date of the notice of intent to lien in which to do so. Hearing procedures must include a method for requesting a hearing in person, by mail or by telephone.

Exemption hearings. The department shall schedule and conduct the exemption hearing promptly. The department shall issue a written decision making specific findings of an obligor’s exemption claim(s), and, if it finds part or all of the funds held by the financial institution or other similar organization to be exempt, shall promptly notify that institution or organization of its determination.

Effect of notice. The notice of intent to lien directed to any financial institution, or other similar institution or organization, shall operate as a hold on any and all accounts specified in the notice. Neither the obligor or non obligor joint owner shall be permitted to withdraw from those accounts until the earlier of:

The date of the decision in obligor’s favor with regard to exemptions; or

Until the administrative hearing and/or judicial process as described in this chapter, is completed and a determination is made.

Recording of notice. If the property subject to the lien is real property or personal property, the title to which is maintained as a public record, the department may record a copy of the notice of intent to lien in the recorder of deeds, division of motor vehicles, or other place where the title to the property is recorded. Any person taking title to the property subsequent to the recording does so subject to the interest of the department, as it may be determined. The notice of intent shall be recorded no more than ten (10) days prior to the mailing of the notice to the obligor under subsection (a) of this section.

[See §

12-1-15

of the General Laws.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 29, § 6; P.L. 1995, ch. 374, § 6; P.L. 1997, ch. 170, § 10; P.L. 2001, ch. 155, § 5.

15-21-4.
Notice of lien.

To perfect a lien with respect to real property, the department shall file a notice of lien with the recorder of deeds for the city or town in which the property is located. The recorder of deeds shall index the notice of intent under the name of the obligor in the grantors index. The filing of a notice of intent of the lien or of a waiver or release of the lien shall be received and registered or recorded without payment of a fee.

To perfect a child support lien with respect to personal property, the department shall file a notice of lien with the secretary of state’s office, the administrator of the division of motor vehicles, or any other office or agency within the state responsible for the filing or recording of liens. The filing of a notice of intent of the lien or of a waiver or release of the lien shall be received and registered or recorded without payment of a fee.

If any obligor against whom a notice of intent to create a child support enforcement lien has been filed according to this section:

Fails to request a hearing within the time frame provided;

Fails to appear; or

Neglects or refuses to pay the sum due after the expiration of thirty (30) days after a hearing is conducted by the department pursuant to §

15-21-3

, at which the determination is made the obligor parent is in arrears.

The notice of intent as filed shall be deemed and operate as a lien which is perfected by the department by the filing of a notice of lien. The notice of lien shall specify the property to be attached and the amount of the arrearage due and shall be filed in the office or city or town where the notice of intent was originally filed.

The lien shall have priority over all subsequent liens or other encumbrances, subject to the provisions of §

6A-9-322

and with the exception of any lien for taxes. A child support lien that has been perfected shall encumber after acquired personal property or proceeds.

If the collection of any unpaid child support will be jeopardized by delay or exigent circumstances, as defined by rules promulgated by the director, the department may apply to the family court for an order to restrain the obligor parent from encumbering, moving, selling, or in any way transferring any real or personal property which may be subject to the provisions of this section.

The lien shall expire upon either termination of a current child support obligation and payment in full of unpaid child support or release of the lien by the department. In any event, a lien under this chapter shall not expire until satisfied and discharged. Expiration of the lien shall not terminate the underlying order or judgment of child support. The department may issue a full or partial waiver or partial release or full discharge of any lien imposed under this section and shall file the waiver, release, or discharge without fee in the city or town or office where the original lien was filed within ten (10) days of the obligor’s compliance with this section. The waiver or release or partial release or full discharge shall be conclusive evidence that the lien upon the property covered by the waiver or release is extinguished.

[See §

12-1-15

of the General Laws.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 29, § 6; P.L. 1995, ch. 374, § 6; P.L. 1998, ch. 370, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 6, § 35.

15-21-5.
Levy of personal property.

In any case where the department has perfected a lien pursuant to §

15-21-4

, the department may collect unpaid child support and levy upon all property as provided in this section. The department shall have the authority to issue an administrative notice of levy or administrative writ of execution to effectuate a levy under this chapter of the law. The term “levy” includes the power of seizure by any means authorized by law. The department may seize and sell any property that is subject to levy. Any person in possession of property upon which a lien has been imposed shall, upon demand, surrender the property to the department.

A levy on property held by an organization with respect to a life insurance or endowment contract shall, without necessity for the surrender of the contract document, constitute a demand by the department for payment of the amount of the lien and the exercise of the right of the obligor to the advance of that amount. The organization shall pay the amount within ninety (90) days after service of notice of levy. The levy shall be deemed to be satisfied if the organization pays over to the department the full amount which the obligor could have had advanced to him or her, provided that the amount does not exceed the amount of the lien.

Whenever any property upon which levy has been made is not sufficient to satisfy the claim of the state for which levy is made, the department may thereafter, as often as necessary, proceed to levy, with notice, upon any other personal property of the obligor liable to levy, until the amount due from him or her, together with expenses, is fully paid. In all cases, any support obligations shall be fully satisfied prior to payments for expenses.

Upon demand by the department, a person who fails or refuses to surrender personal property subject to levy shall be liable in his or her own person and estate to the state in a sum equal to the value of the property not so surrendered, but not exceeding the amount of the lien, together with costs and interest, at the rate authorized for civil judgments, from the date of the levy. In addition, any person required to surrender property who fails or refuses to surrender the property without reasonable cause shall be liable for a penalty equal to twenty-five percent (25%) of the amount recoverable. The interest or penalty incurred under this subsection shall be paid to the general fund and shall not be credited against the child support liability. Any non-obligor party aggrieved by a decision of the department may, within ten (10) days of receipt of notice of demand, request an administrative hearing with the department.

[See §

12-1-15

of the General Laws.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 29, § 6; P.L. 1995, ch. 374, § 6; P.L. 2001, ch. 155, § 5.

15-21-6.
Release from liability.

Any person in possession of, or obligated with respect to, personal property who upon demand by the department surrenders the property or discharges the obligation to the department, or who pays a liability under this section, shall be discharged from any obligation or liability to the obligor arising from the surrender or payment.

In the case of a levy on an organization with respect to a life insurance or endowment contract, which is satisfied pursuant to this section, the organization shall also be discharged from any obligation or liability to any beneficiary arising from the surrender of payment.

[See §

12-1-15

of the General Laws.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 29, 6; § P.L. 1995, ch. 374, § 6.

15-21-7.
Foreclosure of lien against real property.

If the department has perfected a lien on real property in accordance with §

15-21-4

, then it shall be lawful for the department or its assigns to sell the real property of any defaulting obligor and the benefit and equity of redemption of the defaulting obligor and his or her heirs, executors, administrators, and assigns, at public auction upon the premises or at any other place that may be designated for that purpose by the department or its assigns, by:

Mailing written notice of the time and place of sale to the defaulting obligor, at his or her last known address, by certified mail, return receipt requested, at least twenty (20) days prior to publishing the notice;

Publishing the notice at least once each week for three (3) successive weeks in a public newspaper published daily in the city or town in which the real property is situated; and if there is no public newspaper published daily in the city or town where the real property is situated, or if the real property is not situated in a city, then:

If the real property is situated in the city of Central Falls, in a public newspaper published daily in the city of Pawtucket;

If the real property is situated in the town of North Providence, in a public newspaper published daily in the city of Providence;

If the real property is situated in any of the towns of Cumberland, Lincoln, Smithfield, or North Smithfield, in a public newspaper published daily in either the city of Pawtucket, Woonsocket, or Providence;

If the real property is situated in the county of Providence elsewhere than in the above named cities and towns, in a public newspaper published daily in the city of Providence;

If the real property is situated in the county of Newport, in a public newspaper published daily in the city of Newport; but if there is no such newspaper published, then in some public newspaper published anywhere in the county of Newport;

If the real property is situated in any of the counties of Bristol, Kent, or Washington:

In a public newspaper published daily in the city or town in which the real property is situated; or

If there is no public newspaper published, then in a public newspaper published in the city or town in which the real property is situated, or in some public newspaper published daily in the county in which the real property is situated, or in a public newspaper published daily in the city of Providence; with powers to adjourn the sale from time to time, provided that publishing of the notice shall be continued, together with a notice of the adjournment or adjournments, at least once each week in the same newspaper; and

By mailing written notice of the sale to any person or entity having an interest of record in the real property, who records not later than thirty (30) days prior to the date originally scheduled for the sale including, without limitation, the holder of any mortgage or deed of trust with respect to the real property, to the address of the person or entity provided for this purpose in the land evidence records or at any other address that the person or entity may have provided the department in writing, the notice to be given by regular or certified mail, return receipt requested, at least twenty (20) days prior to the date originally scheduled for the sale; and in his or her or their own name or names, or as the attorney or attorneys of the defaulting obligor (for that purpose by these presents duly authorized and appointed with full power of substitution and revocation) to make, execute, and deliver to the purchaser or purchasers at the sale a good and sufficient deed or deeds of the defaulted real property, in fee simple, and to receive the proceeds of the sale or sales, and from these proceeds to retain all sums secured by the lien in favor of the department as of the date of the sale together with all expenses incident to the sale or sales, or for making deeds under this chapter, and for fees of counsel and attorneys, and all costs or expenses incurred in the exercise of these powers, and all taxes, assessments, and premiums for insurance, if any, either paid by the department, or its assigns, or remaining unpaid upon the defaulted real property, rendering and paying the surplus of the proceeds of sale, if any, over and above the amounts to be retained as previously provided, together with a true and particular account of the sale or sales, expenses, and charges, to the defaulting obligor, or his or her heirs, executors, administrators, or assigns; which sale or sales made as previously provided shall forever be a perpetual bar against the defaulting obligor and his or her heirs, executors, administrators, and assigns, and all persons claiming the defaulted real property, so sold, by, through, or under him or her, them, or any of them.

Any foreclosure sale held by the department pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, and the title conveyed to any purchaser or purchasers pursuant to the sale, shall be subject to any lien or encumbrance entitled to a priority over the lien of the department pursuant to §

15-21-4

.

[See §

12-1-15

of the General Laws.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 29, § 6; P.L. 1995, ch. 374, § 6; P.L. 1997, ch. 170, § 10.

15-21-8.
Civil actions not precluded.

In any case where there has been a refusal or neglect to pay any child support or to discharge any liability in respect to child support, whether or not a levy has been made, the department, in addition to other modes of relief, may file an action in the family court.

The filing of a civil action shall not preclude the department from enforcing the child support order through the use of any administrative means permitted by federal or state law.

[See §

12-1-15

of the General Laws.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 29, § 6; P.L. 1995, ch. 374, § 6.

15-21-9.
Written notice to obligor.

At the time of perfecting a lien, executing a levy, or seizing any property, the department shall send written notice to the obligor by first class mail of the action taken.

[See §

12-1-15

of the General Laws.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 29, § 6; P.L. 1995, ch. 374, § 6.

15-21-10.
Judicial review.

Any person aggrieved by a determination of the department pursuant to this chapter may seek judicial review within thirty (30) days of the department’s decision on exemptions or within thirty (30) days of the department’s final determination by filing a motion with the court. Commencement of the review shall not, unless specifically ordered, stay enforcement of the child support collection procedures described in §

15-21-1

.

[See §

12-1-15

of the General Laws.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 29, § 6; P.L. 1995, ch. 374, § 6; P.L. 2001, ch. 155, § 5.

15-21-11.
Full faith and credit of liens.

A lien procured by another jurisdiction, in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, shall be accorded full faith and credit without the requirement of a hearing.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 170, § 11.